Tennessee, session 114, SB2603.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-228, is amended by adding the
following new subsection:
(c) There is exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter the retail sale of food
and food ingredients, as defined in § 67-6-102, if sold to a person who is sixty-five (65)
years of age or older and a resident of this state.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-228(a), is amended by deleting
"subsection (b)" and substituting instead "subsections (b) and (c)".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2603
007888
- 1 -